Utah statutes.
41-6a-1004.   Emergency vehicle -- Necessary signals -- Duties of operator -- Pedestrian to yield.

(1) A pedestrian shall yield the right-of-way to an authorized emergency vehicle upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle using audible or visual signals in accordance with Section 41-6a-212 or 41-6a-1625.

(2)  This section does not relieve the operator of an authorized emergency vehicle from:

(a)  the duty to drive with regard for the safety of all persons using the highway; nor

(b)  from the duty to exercise care to avoid colliding with a pedestrian.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

